Utah statutes.
53-8-105.   Duties of Highway Patrol.
In addition to the duties in this chapter, the Highway Patrol shall:
(1)  enforce the state laws and rules governing use of the state highways;
(2)  regulate traffic on all highways and roads of the state;
(3)  assist the governor in an emergency or at other times at his discretion;
(4)  in cooperation with federal, state, and local agencies, enforce and
assist in the enforcement of all state and federal laws related to the
operation of a motor carrier on a highway, including all state and federal
rules and regulations;
(5)  inspect certain vehicles to determine road worthiness and safe condition
as provided in Section 41-6a-1630;
(6)  upon request, assist with any condition of unrest existing or developing
on a campus or related facility of an institution of higher education;
(7)  assist the Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission in an emergency to
enforce the state liquor laws;
(8)  provide security and protection for both houses of the Legislature while
in session as the speaker of the House of Representatives and the president of
the Senate finds necessary; and
(9)  carry out the following for the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals:
(a)  provide security and protection to those courts when in session in the
capital city of the state;
(b)  execute orders issued by the courts; and
(c)  carry out duties as directed by the courts.
